District of Columbia statutes.
16-5301

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Unsworn Foreign Declarations Act”.

July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-191, § 2(b), 57 DCR 3400

History

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1 of the Uniform Unsworn Foreign Declarations Act.

Editor's Notes